District of Columbia statutes.
29-102.02

Forms.

(a)

The Mayor may provide forms for entity filings required or permitted to be made by this title, but, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section, their use shall not be required.

(b)

The Mayor may require that a cover sheet for an entity filing and a biennial report be on forms prescribed by the Mayor.

(c)

The Mayor may require that any filing by a foreign entity under this title be on a form prescribed by the Mayor.

(d)

The Mayor, by rule, may authorize, but not require, any filing required or permitted by this title to be filed by electronic means and may prescribe forms and procedures for the electronic filings.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History